Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.260

Public employees' retirement system funds created.

For the purpose of the internal accounting record of the public employees' retirement system and not the segregation of moneys on deposit with the state treasurer there are hereby created the employees' savings fund, the benefit account fund, and such other funds as the director may from time to time create.

(1) The employees' savings fund shall be the fund in which shall be accumulated the contributions from the compensation of public employees' retirement system members. The director shall provide for the maintenance of an individual account for each member of the public employees' retirement system showing the amount of the member's contributions together with interest accumulations thereon. The contributions of a member returned to the former employee upon the individual's withdrawal from service, or paid in event of the employee's or former employee's death, as provided in chapter 41.40 RCW, shall be paid from the employees' savings fund. The accumulated contributions of a member, upon the commencement of the individual's retirement, shall be transferred from the employees' savings fund to the benefit account fund.

(2) The benefit account fund shall be the fund in which shall be accumulated the reserves for the payment of all public employees' retirement system retirement allowances and death benefits, if any, in respect of any beneficiary. The amounts contributed by all public employees' retirement system employers to provide pension benefits shall be credited to the benefit account fund. The benefit account fund shall be the fund from which shall be paid all public employees' retirement system retirement allowances, or benefits in lieu thereof because of which reserves have been transferred from the employees' savings fund to the benefit account fund. At the time a recipient of a retirement allowance again becomes a member of the public employees' retirement system, the department shall transfer from the benefit account fund to the employees' savings fund and credit to the individual account of such a member a sum equal to the excess, if any, of the individual's account at the date of the member's retirement over any service retirement allowance received since that date.

[ 1992 c 212 s 11; 1991 c 35 s 74; 1982 1st ex.s. c 52 s 18; 1973 1st ex.s. c 190 s 4; 1972 ex.s. c 151 s 2; 1967 c 127 s 2; 1963 c 174 s 7; 1953 c 200 s 4; 1949 c 240 s 6; 1947 c 274 s 11; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 11072-11. Formerly RCW 41.40.100.]

NOTES:

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.

Effective dates—1982 1st ex.s. c 52: See note following RCW 2.10.180.

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 190: See note following RCW 41.40.010.